en: Battery management features: Cell balancing; Current monitoring; Data logging; Depth of discharge (DOD) estimation; Energy efficiency optimization; Fault detection; Lifespan prediction; Preemptive maintenance alerts; Remote monitoring; State of charge (SOC) estimation; State of health (SOH) estimation; Temperature monitoring; Thermal management; Voltage monitoring; Other
th: คุณลักษณะการจัดการแบตเตอรี่: การปรับสมดุลเซลล์แบตเตอรี่; การตรวจสอบกระแสไฟฟ้า; การบันทึกข้อมูล; การประมาณความลึกของการคายประจุ (DOD); การเพิ่มประสิทธิภาพการใช้พลังงาน; การตรวจจับข้อผิดพลาด; การคาดการณ์ยอายุการใช้งาน; การแจ้งเตือนการบำรุงรักษาล่วงหน้า; การตรวจติดตามระยะไกล; การประมาณความจุของแบตเตอรี่ (SOC); การประมาณสภาพแบตเตอรี่ (SOC); การตรวจสอบอุณหภูมิ; การจัดการความร้อน; การตรวจสอบแรงดันไฟฟ้า; อื่นๆ
el: Λειτουργίες διαχείρισης μπαταρίας: Εξισορρόπηση κυψελών; Τρέχουσα παρακολούθηση; Καταγραφή δεδομένων; Εκτίμηση βάθους εκφόρτισης (DOD); Βελτιστοποίηση ενεργειακής απόδοσης; Ανίχνευση σφαλμάτων; Πρόβλεψη διάρκειας ζωής; Ειδοποιήσεις προληπτικής συντήρησης; Απομακρυσμένη παρακολούθηση; Εκτίμηση κατάστασης φόρτισης (SOC); Εκτίμηση κατάστασης υγείας (SOH); Παρακολούθηση θερμοκρασίας; Θερμική διαχείριση; Παρακολούθηση τάσης; Άλλο
ko: 배터리 관리 기능: 셀 밸런싱; 전류 모니터링; 데이터 로깅; 방전심도(DOD) 추정; 에너지 효율 최적화; 결함 감지; 수명 예측; 선제적 유지보수 알림; 원격 모니터링; 충전 상태(SOC) 추정; 건강 상태(SOH) 추정; 온도 모니터링; 열 관리; 전압 모니터링; 기타
it: Funzionalità di gestione della batteria: Bilanciamento cellulare; Monitoraggio corrente; Registrazione dati; Stima della profondità di scarico (DOD); Ottimizzazione dell'efficienza energetica; Rilevamento guasti; Previsione della durata della vita; Avvisi di manutenzione preventiva; Monitoraggio remoto; Stima dello stato di carica (SOC); Stima dello stato di salute (SOH); Monitoraggio della temperatura; Gestione termica; Monitoraggio della tensione; Altro
pl: Funkcje zarządzania akumulatorami: Równoważenie komórek; Monitorowanie prądu; Zapisywanie danych; Szacowanie głębokości rozładowania; Optymalizacja efektywności energetycznej; Wykrywanie usterek; Prognozowanie żywotności; Alerty dotyczące konserwacji prewencyjnej; Monitorowanie zdalne; Oszacowanie stanu naładowania (SOC); Oszacowanie stanu zdrowia (SOH); Monitorowanie temperatury; Zarządzanie temperaturą; Kontrola napięcia; Inne
sk-SK: Funkcie správy batérie: Vyvažovanie buniek; Aktuálne sledovanie; Záznam údajov; Odhad miery vybitia (DOD); Optimalizácia energetickej účinnosti; Detekcia porúch; Predpoveď životnosti; Výstrahy preventívnej údržby; Vzdialený monitoring; Odhad stavu nabitia (SOC); Odhad zdravotného stavu (SOH); Monitorovanie teploty; Tepelný manažment; Monitorovanie napätia; Iné
zh-CN: 电池管理功能: 电池平衡; 电流监测; 数据记录; 放电深度 (DOD) 估算; 能源效率优化; 故障检测; 使用寿命预测; 预防性维护警报; 远程监测; 剩余电量 (SOC) 估计; 电池健康状况 (SOH) 估计; 温度监测; 热管理; 电压监测; 其他
nl: Kenmerken batterijbeheer: Celbalancering; Stroombewaking; Gegevens bijhouden; Schatting van de diepte van de ontlading (DOD).; Optimalisatie van de energie-efficiëntie; Foutdetectie; Voorspelling van de levensduur; Waarschuwingen voor preventief onderhoud; Controle op afstand; Schatting van de laadstatus (SOC); Schatting van de gezondheidsstatus (SOH); Temperatuurbewaking; Warmtebeheer; Spanningsbewaking; Andere
hu: Akkumulátorkezelési funkciók: Cellakiegyenlítés; Áramerősség-figyelés; Adatnaplózás; Kisülési mélység (DOD) becslése; Energiahatékonyság-optimalizálás; Hibaészlelés; Élettartam-előrejelzés; Megelőző karbantartási riasztások; Távfelügyelet; Töltöttségi állapot (SOC) becslése; Üzemállapot (SOH) becslése; Hőmérséklet-figyelés; Hőkezelés; Feszültségfigyelés; Egyéb
fi: Akun hallintaominaisuudet: Kennojen tasapainotus; Virran seuranta; Tietojen kirjaaminen; Purkauksen syvyyden (DOD) arvio; Energiatehokkuuden optimointi; Vian havaitseminen; Elinajan ennuste; Ennaltaehkäisevät huoltoilmoitukset; Etävalvonta; Varaustilan (SOC) arvio; Terveydentila-arvio (SOH); Lämpötilan seuranta; Lämmönhallinta; Jännitteen valvonta; Muu
vi: Tính năng quản lý pin: Cân bằng lõi; Theo dõi dòng điện; Ghi dữ liệu; Ước tính độ sâu xả (DOD); Tối ưu hóa hiệu quả năng lượng; Phát hiện lỗi; Dự đoán tuổi thọ; Cảnh báo bảo trì ưu tiên; Giám sát từ xa; Ước tính trạng thái sạc (SOC); Ước tính tình trạng pin (SOH); Theo dõi nhiệt độ; Kiểm soát nhiệt; Giám sát điện áp; Khác
ru: Функции системы управления аккумуляторами: Выравнивание плотности электролита; Контроль тока; Регистрация данных; Оценка глубины разряда (DOD); Оптимизация энергоэффективности; Обнаружение неисправностей; Прогнозирование срока службы; Оповещения о необходимости профилактического обслуживания; Дистанционное управление; Оценка состояния заряда (SOC); Оценка работоспособности (SOH); Мониторинг температуры; Управление температурой; Мониторинг напряжения; Другое
zh-TW: 電池管理功能: 電蕊平衡; 電流監測; 資料記錄; 放電深度 (DOD) 評估; 能源效率最佳化; 故障檢測; 壽命預測; 預防性維護警報; 遠端監控; 充電狀態（SOC）估計; 健康狀況（SOH）估計; 溫度監測; 熱管理; 電壓監測; 其他
sv: Detaljer för batterihantering: Cellbalansering; Aktuell övervakning; Dataloggning; Uppskattning av urladdningsdjup (DOD).; Energieffektivisering; Feldetektering; Livslängdsförutsägelse; Varningar för förebyggande underhåll; Spänningsövervakning; Uppskattning av laddningstillstånd (SOC); Uppskattning av hälsotillstånd (SOH); Temperaturövervakning; Termisk hantering; Spänningsövervakning; Övrigt
es: Características de gestión de la batería: Equilibrio de celdas; Supervisión de corriente; Registro de datos; Estimación de nivel de descarga (DOD); Optimización de eficiencia energética; Detección de fallos; Pronóstico de vida útil; Alertas de mantenimiento preventivo; Supervisión remota; Estimación del estado de carga (SOC); Estimación del estado (SOH); Supervisión de temperatura; Gestión térmica; Control de tensión; Otros
de: Batteriemanagementfunktionen: Zellausgleich; Stromüberwachung; Datenprotokollierung; Schätzung der Entladetiefe (DOD); Optimierung der Energieeffizienz; Fehlererkennung; Lebensdauervorhersage; Präventive Wartungswarnungen; Fernüberwachung; Schätzung des Ladezustands (SOC); Schätzung des Integritätszustands (SOH); Temperaturüberwachung; Wärmemanagement; Spannungsüberwachung; Sonstiges
nb: Batteristyringssystemer: Cellebalansering; Gjeldende overvåking; Datalogging; Depth of Discharge (DoD), estimering; Energieffektivisering; Feildeteksjon; Forutsigelse av levetid; Forebyggende vedlikeholdsvarsler; Fjernovervåking; Estimering av ladetilstand (SOC); Estimering av helsetilstand (SOH); Temperaturovervåking; Termisk styring; Spenningsovervåking; Annet
ja: バッテリ管理機能: セルバランシング; 電流モニター; データロギング; 放電深度 (DOD) 推定; エネルギー効率の最適化; 故障検出; 寿命予測; 予防的メンテナンスアラート; リモートモニター; 充電状態 (SOC) 推定; 正常性 (SOH) 推定; 温度モニター; 熱管理; 電圧監視; その他
fr: Fonctionnalités de gestion de la batterie: Équilibrage des cellules; Surveillance du courant; Enregistrement des données; Estimation du degré de décharge (DOD); Optimisation de l’efficacité énergétique; Détection des anomalies; Prévision de la durée de vie; Alertes de maintenance préventive; Surveillance à distance; Estimation de l’état de charge (SOC); Estimation de l’état de santé (SOH); Gestion de la température; Gestion thermique; Suivi de la tension; Autre
bg-BG: Функции за управление на батерията: Балансиране на клетките; Текущ мониторинг; Регистриране на данни; Оценка на дълбочината на разреждане (DOD).; Оптимизиране на енергийната ефективност; Откриване на неизправности; Прогнозиране на продължителността на живота; Предупреждения за превантивна поддръжка; Дистанционен мониторинг; Оценка на състоянието на заряда (SOC); Оценка на състоянието (SOH); Следене на температурата; Управление на топлината; Мониторинг на напрежението; Други
hr-HR: Značajke upravljanja baterijom: Balansiranje ćelija; Trenutačno praćenje; Zapisivanje podataka; Procjena dubine pražnjenja; Optimizacija energetske učinkovitosti; Otkrivanje grešaka; Predviđanje vijeka trajanja; Preventivna upozorenja za održavanje; Daljinski nadzor; Procjena stanja napunjenosti; Procjena zdravstvenog stanja; Praćenje temperature; Upravljanje toplinom; Praćenje napona; Ostalo
ro-RO: Funcții gestionare baterie: Echilibrarea celulelor; Monitorizare curent; Înregistrarea datelor; Estimarea adâncimii de descărcare (DOD); Optimizarea eficienței energetice; Detectarea defecțiunilor; Predicția duratei de viață; Alerte de întreținere preventivă; Monitorizare de la distanță; Estimarea stării de încărcare (SOC); Estimarea stării de sănătate (SOH); Monitorizarea temperaturii; Controlul temperaturii; Monitorizarea tensiunii; Altele
lt-LT: Akumuliatoriaus valdymo funkcijos: Elementų balansavimas; Srovės stebėjimas; Duomenų registravimas; Iškrovos gylio (DOD) įvertinimas; Energijos efektyvumo optimizavimas; Gedimų aptikimas; Gyvavimo trukmės prognozė; Įspėjimai apie prevencinę priežiūrą; Nuotolinė stebėsena; Įkrovimo būsenos (SOC) įvertinimas; Akumuliatoriaus nusidėvėjimo (SOH) įvertinimas; Temperatūros stebėjimas; Terminis valdymas; Įtampos stebėsena; Kita
sl-SI: Funkcije za upravljanje baterije: Uravnoteženje celic; Nadzor toka; Beleženje podatkov; Ocena globine praznjenja (DOD).; Optimizacija energetske učinkovitosti; Odkrivanje napak; Napoved življenjske dobe; Opozorila za preventivno vzdrževanje; Spremljanje na daljavo; Ocena stanja napolnjenosti (SOC).; Ocena zdravstvenega stanja (SOH).; Spremljanje temperature; Toplotno upravljanje; Nadzor napetosti; Drugo
pt-PT: Características de gestão de bateria: Equilíbrio celular; Monitorização atual; Registo de dados; Estimativa de profundidade de descarga (DoD, Depth of Discharge); Otimização da eficiência energética; Deteção de falhas; Previsão de vida útil; Alertas de manutenção preventiva; Monitorização remota; Estimativa do estado de carga (SoC), State of Charge); Estimativa do estado de funcionamento (SoH, State of Health); Monitorização da temperatura; Gestão térmica; Monitorização da tensão; Outro
cs: Vlastnosti správy baterie: Vyvažování buněk; Monitorování proudu; Záznam dat; Odhad hloubky vybití (DOD); Optimalizace energetické účinnosti; Detekce poruch; Předpověď životnosti; Upozornění na preventivní údržbu; Vzdálené sledování; Odhad stavu nabití (SOC); Odhad stavu (SOH); Monitorování teploty; Tepelné řízení; Monitorování napětí; Jiné
tr: Akü Yönetim Sistemleri: Hücre dengeleme; Akım izleme; Veri kaydı; Deşarj derinliği (DOD) tahmini; Enerji verimliliği optimizasyonu; Arıza algılama; Ömür tahmini; Önleyici bakım uyarıları; Uzaktan izleme; Şarj durumu (SOC) tahmini; Sağlık durumu (SOH) tahmini; Sıcaklık izleme; Termal yönetim; Voltaj izleme; Diğer
da: Batteristyringsfunktioner: Cellebalancering; Strømovervågning; Datalogning; Estimering af afladningsdybde (DOD); Energieffektiviseringsoptimering; Fejldetektering; Forudsigelse af levetid; Forebyggende vedligeholdelsesadvarsler; Fjernovervågning; Estimering af ladningstilstand (SOC); Estimering af sundhedstilstand (SOH); Temperaturovervågning; Termisk styring; Spændingsovervågning; Andet
pt-BR: Recursos de gerenciamento de bateria: Balanceamento de células; Monitoramento atual; Registro de dados; Estimativa de profundidade de descarga (DOD); Otimização da eficiência energética; Detecção de falha; Previsão de vida útil; Alertas de manutenção preventiva; Monitoramento remoto; Estimativa do estado de carga (SOC); Estimativa do estado de integridade (SOH); Monitoramento de temperatura; Gerenciamento térmico; Monitoramento de tensão; Outro